Missouri, session 2026, HB3543.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.1073, to read as follows:
137.1073. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the state tax commission;
(2) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who:
(a) Has served on active duty or state active duty as a member of the Armed
Forces of the United States, the National Guard, or the United States Reserve Forces;
(b) Was discharged under honorable conditions;
(c) Has been adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as
having a service-related disability that renders such veteran as being one hundred
percent totally disabled or as being less than one hundred percent totally disabled but is
compensated at the one hundred percent level due to individual unemployability or is
entitled to receive a statutory award from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs for:
a. Loss or permanent loss of use of one or both feet;
b. Loss or permanent loss of use of one or both hands;
c. Loss of sight in one or both eyes; or
d. Permanent impairment of vision of both eyes; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3543 2
(d) Is an owner of record and liable for the payment of property taxes on the
qualified residence for which the exemption allowed under this section is claimed;
(3) "Homestead", the real property located within the state of Missouri that is
actually owned and occupied by an individual as his or her primary residence and not to
exceed five acres of land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the
dwelling as a home;
(4) "Qualified residence", the residential real property used as a homestead by a
disabled veteran or surviving spouse, but less any portion of the property that is used
for commercial purposes. If the property, or a portion of the property, is rented out to
another person for more than six months it is presumed to be used for commercial
purposes. No more than one property per claimant per tax year shall be claimed as a
qualified residence under this section.
2. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, a county shall grant an annual exemption for a qualified
residence of a disabled veteran in an amount equal to the greater of thirty-two thousand
five hundred dollars or the maximum amount that may be granted to a disabled veteran
under 38 U.S.C. Section 2102, as amended, from all ad valorem taxation assessed on the
qualified residence. The value of all property in excess of the exempted amount shall
remain subject to taxation.
3. The exemption under this section carries over to the benefit of the disabled
veteran's unremarried surviving spouse or minor children as long as the unremarried
surviving spouse or minor children continue to actually occupy the residence as a
homestead or to any subsequent homestead within the same county, where such spouse
or minor children continue to occupy the residence as a homestead. No exemption shall
be allowed for the tax year in which the surviving spouse remarries.
4. The claim for an exemption shall not be transferred or assigned, except as
provided for under this section.
5. The governing body of the county may adopt reasonable procedures and
promulgate ordinances, rules, and regulations in order to implement and administer the
provisions of this section. Eligibility determinations shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established by this section and any additional local rules or regulations.
6. The exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of setting
the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri and
section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year. Nothing in this section
shall impair the obligation of any contract, reduce or restrict the taxing authority of any

HB 3543 3
political subdivision, or alter the calculation of assessed valuation for the purposes of
bonded indebtedness.
7. (1) All revenues lost resulting from the exemption authorized under this
section may be replaced to each taxing authority within a county from a countywide
replacement sales tax on all retail sales made within the county that are subject to sales
tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized under this section shall be imposed by
resolution at a rate necessary to produce the same revenue produced by the tax on the
real property exempted under this section in the previous year, and shall be imposed
solely for the same purposes as the property tax was imposed. The tax authorized under
this subsection shall be in addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be
stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(2) No such resolution adopted under this section shall become effective unless
the governing body of the county submits to the voters residing within the county at a
state general, primary, or special election a proposal to authorize the governing body to
impose the exemption and the replacement tax under this section. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, the exemption and replacement tax shall become effective on the first day of
the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notification of the
adoption of the local sales tax. If the majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, the exemption shall not
become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
(3) All revenue collected under this subsection by the director of the department
of revenue on behalf of the county, except for one percent for the cost of collection that
shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special
trust fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the "Veterans Homestead
Property Tax Replacement Sales Tax Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated
purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to be state funds, and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director may make refunds from the
amounts in the fund and credited to the county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
credit of such county. Any funds in the special fund which are not needed for current
expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
(4) The governing body of any county that has adopted the replacement sales tax
authorized in this section may submit the question of repeal of the replacement tax to

HB 3543 4
the voters on any date available for elections for the county. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which
such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, the replacement sales tax
authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under
this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
(5) If the replacement tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds
100 remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated
101 purposes, and the county shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the
102 action at least ninety days before the effective date of the repeal and the director may
103 order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount
104 collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax
105 and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
106 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the replacement tax in
107 such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close
108 the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each instance of any
109 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
110 8. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
111 (1) The provisions of this section shall sunset six years after the effective date of
112 this section unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
113 (2) This section shall terminate on January first of the calendar year
114 immediately following the calendar year in which the provisions of this section are
115 sunset.
✔